foma/verb/ThamizhiVerbs-C11.lexc
LEXICON Vtheerinf

%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^த்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^த்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^த்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^த்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^த்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^த்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^த்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^த்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^த்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^த்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^த்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^த்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^த்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^க்கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^க்கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^க்கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^க்கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^க்கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^க்கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^க்கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^க்கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^க்கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^க்கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^க்கின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^க்கின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கின்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^க்கின்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^க்கின்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^க்கின்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^க்கின்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^க்கின்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^க்கின்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^க்கின்றது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3pln%=அன:^க்கின்றன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்போம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3sgn%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3pln%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=(த்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^த்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=(த்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^த்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=(த்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^த்தனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^க்கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^க்கிறனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^க்கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^க்கின்றனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+imp%=∅%|+2sg%=∅:^ #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+imp%=∅%|+2pl%=உங்கள்:^ுங்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பித்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பித்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பித்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பித்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பித்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பித்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பித்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பித்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பித்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பித்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பித்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ப்பித்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^ப்பித்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பிக்கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பிக்கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பிக்கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பிக்கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பிக்கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பிக்கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பிக்கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பிக்கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ப்பிக்கிறது #;

LEXICON ClassTheer11
விழுத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
விதித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
விகண்டித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
விசனித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
வருணித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
வைத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
வெடுவெடுத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
வலத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
வஞ்சித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
திமிர்த்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
தளிர்த்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
துவந்தித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
துனித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
தமித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
தாபித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
தொந்தரித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
தனித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
தேர்த்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
ரமித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
மளமளத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
முனைத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
மாய்த்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
மொசுமொசுத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
மடித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கிளைத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கவர்த்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
குமிட்டித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
குடுகுடுத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கம்பீரித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கெமிளித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கப்பித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கடுகடுத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கோடீகரித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பிரவர்த்தித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பிரகாசித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பிசுபிசுத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
புரோட்சித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பரிவேட்டித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பரதவித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பாலித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பொருபொருத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பலித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பேர்த்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பூஷித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
நிர்வகித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
நிறத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
நுகைத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
நாணித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
நெகிழ்த்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
நேர்த்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சித்திரித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சினைத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சிறக்கணித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சுளித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சும்புளித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சமித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சமாய்த்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
செழுசெழுத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
செந்தலித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சந்தேகித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சேர்த்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சங்கரித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சஞ்சரித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
ஒப்பித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
ஓமித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
என்பித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
இருத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
இலைச்சித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
ஆவளித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
ஆகரித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
உவர்த்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
உரித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
உபயோகித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
உடுத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
அவைத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
அருத்தித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
அபிநயித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
அனுசரித்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
அசைத்துத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சிறந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
துறந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
நடந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
இறந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
விரண்டுத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
துவண்டுத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
மென்றுத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
தவன்றுத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சூன்றுத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கினிந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
குமிந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
கீழ்ந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
மலைந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
முசிந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
திதைந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
துய்ந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
தேர்ந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
தவழ்ந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
சுரிந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
விளிந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
வசிந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
பிய்ந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
பதிந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
பொரிந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
ஞெலிந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
ஒலிந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
உலைந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
நிகர்ந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
நசிந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
நவிர்ந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
அழிந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
அசர்ந்துதீர்	Vtheerinf;
குறாவித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
குணட்டித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
குன்றித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கம்மித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கிண்டித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கடத்தித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கருளித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கனவித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கோரித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
கூறித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
வவ்வித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
விளம்பித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
விரட்டித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
வணங்கித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
புகுத்தித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பயிற்றித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பசப்பித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பதறித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பொருமித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
முங்கித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
மிறுங்கித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
மருக்கித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சுற்றித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சிக்கித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
சீந்தித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
செருமித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
துயக்கித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
துன்னித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
திருக்கித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
தாண்டித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
தோண்டித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
நுணாவித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
நிவறித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
நீடித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
நழுக்கித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
நொந்தித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
ஒஃகித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
எறட்டித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
உறங்கித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
உருகித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
இறங்கித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
இழிசித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
அம்மித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
அணாப்பித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
அராத்தித்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பட்டுத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
பெட்டுத்தீர்	Vtheerinf;
